Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 07. Athletic Trainers.

Effective dates. —

Section 8, ch. 36, SLA 2014 makes this chapter effective July 1, 2015.

Sec. 08.07.010.
License required.

An individual may not practice or offer to practice athletic training, or allow another person to offer athletic training by the individual, in the state without being licensed under this chapter, unless the individual is

a student in an accredited athletic trainer program who is practicing athletic training under the supervision of an athletic trainer or a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy under AS 08.64;

licensed, certified, or registered as an athletic trainer in another state and is present in the state for not more than 90 days in a calendar year for a specific athletic event or series of athletic events with an individual or group not based in the state; or

in the military service of the United States or as an employee of the federal government performing athletic training services within the scope of the individual’s official duties.

This section does not prohibit a person licensed under another chapter of this title from performing functions defined as athletic training if those functions are within the scope of that person’s license and the person does not use a title listed in (d) of this section.

Nothing in this chapter requires licensing of a coach or fitness trainer who

does not use a title listed in (d) of this section; and

is acting within the scope of the person’s duties as a coach or fitness trainer.

Unless licensed under this chapter or exempted under (a)(2) or (3) of this section, an individual may not use the titles “athletic trainer,” “licensed athletic trainer,” “certified athletic trainer,” “athletic trainer certified,” “A.T.,” “A.T.L.,” “C.A.T.,” “A.T.C.,” or any combination of those terms to indicate that the individual is a licensed athletic trainer.

History.

(§ 2 ch 36 SLA 2014)

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 5, ch. 36, SLA 2014, the licensing requirement in this section will not apply until July 1, 2017 “to a person who has been practicing athletic training in this state for at least three of the five years immediately preceding July 1, 2015”.
See sec. 5, ch. 36, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts for the complete applicability provisions for this section.

Sec. 08.07.020.
Qualifications for license; fee; renewal.

The department shall issue an athletic trainer license to an individual who

applies to the department on a form provided by the department;

meets the requirements established in regulation by the department;

pays the fees established by the department; and

provides proof of certification by the Board of Certification, Inc., or another nationally recognized professional association approved by the department.

An athletic trainer license may be renewed upon proof of certification by the Board of Certification, Inc., or another nationally recognized professional association approved by the department and as provided in AS

08.01.100

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 36 SLA 2014)

Sec. 08.07.030.
Scope of practice of athletic trainers.

An athletic trainer may practice athletic training only under the direction of a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy under AS 08.64. In this subsection, “direction” means the physician authorizes a procedure by a verbal order if the physician is present or by written order, telecommunication, or athletic training treatment plans, protocols, or standing orders established by the physician if the physician is not present.

An athletic trainer shall immediately refer an athlete to an appropriate licensed health care professional if the athletic trainer determines that athletic training is contraindicated or the symptoms or conditions present require treatment outside the scope of practice of an athletic trainer.

The practice of an athletic trainer includes

the treatment of an athlete for an athletic injury or illness prevention;

the clinical evaluation and assessment of an athlete for an athletic injury or illness sustained or exacerbated while participating in an athletic or sport-related exercise or activity;

the immediate care and treatment of an athlete for an athletic injury or illness sustained or exacerbated while participating in an athletic or sport-related exercise or activity; and

the rehabilitation and reconditioning of an athlete from an athletic injury or illness sustained or exacerbated while participating in an athletic or sport-related exercise or activity.

In this section, “health care professional” has the meaning given to “health care provider” in AS

09.65.300

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 36 SLA 2014)

Sec. 08.07.040.
Regulations.

After consulting the professional standards issued by the Board of Certification, Inc., the board’s successor, or another nationally recognized professional association approved by the department, the department shall adopt regulations to protect the public, ensure quality patient care, and regulate the licensing of athletic trainers that include

minimum standards for licensure as an athletic trainer;

minimum standards of care for practice as an athletic trainer; and

continuing education requirements.

History.

(§ 2 ch 36 SLA 2014)

Editor’s notes. —

For a transitional provision effective June 19, 2014 authorizing the Department to adopt regulations necessary to implement the changes made by ch. 36, SLA 2014, with the regulations not to take effect before July 1, 2015, see sec. 6, ch. 36, SLA 2014.

Sec. 08.07.090.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“athlete” means an individual who participates in an athletic or sport-related exercise or activity, including interscholastic, intercollegiate, intramural, semiprofessional, and professional sports activities;

“athletic injury or illness” means an injury or illness sustained or exacerbated through participation in an activity, exercise, recreation, sport, or game requiring physical strength, range of motion, flexibility, body awareness and control, speed, stamina, or agility of a type sustained in association with sports participation as part of an educational institution, professional sports club, amateur sports club, recreational sports club, or organization;

“athletic trainer” means an individual who is licensed under AS

08.07.020

to practice athletic training in this state;

“athletic training” means injury and illness prevention and the evaluation, assessment, immediate care, treatment, rehabilitation, and reconditioning of an athletic injury or illness.

History.

(§ 2 ch 36 SLA 2014)